Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5322.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 12k. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters 258 to 260 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 259.80f(3) Pub saf D Possessing weapon in sterile area of commercial airport 10 259.83(2)(b) Pub saf G Aircraft â failure to comply with certification requirements â second violation 2 259.83(2)(c) Pub saf F Aircraft â failure to comply with certification requirements â third or subsequent violation 4 259.83b(2)(a) Pub saf F Conducting flight operations without certificate 4 259.83b(2)(b) Pub saf E Conducting flight operations without certificate â second violation 5 259.83b(2)(c) Pub saf D Conducting flight operations without certificate â third or subsequent violation 10 259.183 Property E Aircraft â unlawful taking or tampering 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 259.185(4) Person C Operating or serving as crew of aircraft while under the influence causing death 15 259.185(5) Person E Operating or serving as crew of aircraft while under the influence causing serious impairment 5 259.185(8) Pub saf E Operating or serving as crew of aircraft while under the influence â third or subsequent offense 5 259.357 Pub saf F Operating an unmanned vehicle in a restricted zone 4 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5321 (request no. H03249'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.